Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.270

Licensee's failure to pay vendor, consignor—Failure of vendor, consignor to file claim.

If a vendor or consignor creditor so addressed fails, refuses or neglects to file in the office of the director his or her verified claim as requested by the director within sixty days from the date of such request, the director shall be relieved of further duty or action on behalf of the producer or consignor creditor.

[ 2003 c 326 s 79; 1959 c 107 s 27.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.